Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.345

Prearrangement trust—Examination by board.

(1) The board shall examine a prearrangement funeral service trust whenever it deems it necessary, but at least once every three years, or whenever the licensee fails after reasonable notice from the board to file the reports required by this chapter or the board.

(2) The expense of the prearrangement funeral service trust examination shall be paid by the licensee and shall not be deducted from the earnings of the trust.

(3) Such examination shall be conducted in private in the principal office of the licensee and the records relating to prearrangement funeral service contracts and prearrangement funeral service trusts shall be available at such office.

[ 2005 c 365 s 23; 1989 c 390 s 10.]